test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaesi24_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - käsi: # Noun (24) käsi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     käsi+N+Sg+Nom: käsi
     käsi+N+Sg+Gen: käe
     käsi+N+Sg+Par: kätt
     käsi+N+Sg+Ill: kätte
     käsi+N+Sg+Ine: [käen, käeh, käehn]
     käsi+N+Sg+Ela: käest
     käsi+N+Sg+All: käele
     käsi+N+Sg+Ade: käel
     käsi+N+Sg+Abl: käelt
     käsi+N+Sg+Tra: käes
     käsi+N+Sg+Ter: käeniq
     käsi+N+Sg+Abe: käeldäq
     käsi+N+Sg+Com: käegaq
     käsi+N+Pl+Nom: käeq
     käsi+N+Pl+Gen: [kässi, käte]
     käsi+N+Pl+Par: kässi
     käsi+N+Pl+Ill: [kässihe, kässi, kässide]
     käsi+N+Pl+Ine: [käsin, käsih, käsihn, kässin, kässih, kässihn, käten, käteh, kätehn]
     käsi+N+Pl+Ela: [käsist, kässist, kätest]
     käsi+N+Pl+All: [käsile, kässile, kätele]
     käsi+N+Pl+Ade: [käsil, kässil, kätel]
     käsi+N+Pl+Abl: [käsilt, kässilt, kätelt]
     käsi+N+Pl+Tra: [käsis, kässis, kätes]
     käsi+N+Pl+Ter: [käsiniq, kässiniq, käteniq]
     käsi+N+Pl+Abe: [käsildäq, kässildäq, käteldäq]
     käsi+N+Pl+Com: [kässigaq, kätegaq]
